Hawaii statutes.
[§663J-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Coerce" means to use or threaten to
use any form of domination, restraint, or control for the purpose of causing an
individual to engage in or remain in prostitution or to relinquish earnings
derived from prostitution. Coercion exists if the totality of the
circumstances establish the existence of domination, restraint, or control that
would have the reasonably foreseeable effect of causing an individual to engage
in or remain in prostitution or to relinquish earnings derived from
prostitution.

"Promoting prostitution" means
promoting prostitution in the first or second degree, as provided in sections
712-1202 and 712-1203, respectively.

"Prostitution" has the same meaning
as provided in section 712-1200. [L 1999, c 203, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next